District of Columbia statutes.
44-1503

Officers to be chosen from members.

The foregoing officers shall be chosen from among the members of the Society.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 3
1981 Ed., § 32-903.
1973 Ed., § 32-203.